Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.420

Annuities and retirement income plans—Retirement at age seventy—Reemployment, conditions when.

(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, faculty members or other employees designated by the boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional universities or of The Evergreen State College, or the *state board for community college education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400 through 28B.10.420 as now or hereafter amended shall be retired from their employment with their institutions of higher education not later than the end of the academic year next following their seventieth birthday.

(2) As provided in this subsection, the board of regents of a state university, the board of trustees of a regional university or The Evergreen State College, or the *state board for community college education may reemploy any person who is "retired" pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, who applies for reemployment and who has reached seventy years of age on or after July 1, 1970. The following provisions shall govern such reemployment:

(a) Prior to the reemployment, the board of regents, board of trustees, or state board shall have found that the person possesses outstanding qualifications which in the judgment of the board would permit the person to continue valuable service to the institution.

(b) The period of reemployment shall not be counted as service under, or result in any eligibility for benefits or increased benefits under, any state authorized or supported annuity or retirement income plan. Reemployment shall not result in the reemployed person or employer making any contributions to any such plan.

(c) No person may be reemployed on a full time basis if such person is receiving benefits under any state authorized or supported annuity or retirement income plan. The reemployment of any person on a full time basis shall be immediately terminated upon the person's obtaining of any such benefits.

(d) A person may be reemployed on a part time basis and receive or continue to receive any benefits for which such person is eligible under any state authorized or supported annuity or retirement income plan. Such part time work, however, shall not exceed forty percent of full time employment during any year.

(e) A person reemployed pursuant to this section shall comply with all conditions of reemployment and all rules providing for the administration of this subsection which are prescribed or adopted by the board of regents, or board of trustees, or by the *state board for community college education.

[ 1979 c 14 s 1. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 276 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 20; 1973 1st ex.s. c 149 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.420; prior: 1947 c 223 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4543-14a. Formerly RCW 28.76.280.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The state board for community college education was renamed the state board for community and technical colleges by 1991 c 238 s 30.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—Appropriation—Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 149: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Retirement, earliest age allowable: RCW 28B.10.400.

"State universities," "regional universities," "state college," "institutions of higher education," and "postsecondary institutions" defined: RCW 28B.10.016.